src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/N-A-wug-test_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/fst/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph:  ../../../src/fst/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

  Lemma - wug test forms :

      # ANIMATE nouns - Inflectional subtypes and continuation lexica:
      # mamam+Err/Dummy:mamam NA ;
      # papap+Err/Dummy:papap NA_POSS/IM ;
      # pipip+Err/Dummy:pipip NA_POSS/IM2 ;
      # tatat+Err/Dummy:tatat NA_DIM/IS ;
      # titit+Err/Dummy:titit NA_DIM/ISIS ;
      # nanan+Err/Dummy:nanan NA_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
      # ninin+Err/Dummy:ninin NA_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS ;
      # kikik+Err/Dummy:kikik NA_POSS/IM2_DIM/IS ;
      # kakak+Err/Dummy:kakak NA_POSS/IM2_DIM/ISIS ;
      # wawâs+Err/Dummy:wawâs NA_DIM/DIM ;
      # ! mam+Err/Dummy:mam NA_SG/A ;
      # ! mim+Err/Dummy:mim NA_SG/I ;
      # nan+Err/Dummy:nan NA_SG/A_POSS/IM ;
      # nin+Err/Dummy:nin NA_SG/I_POSS/IM ;
      # pap+Err/Dummy:pap NA_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/IS ;
      # pip+Err/Dummy:pip NA_SG/A_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS ;

      # mamam - NA (no -im possessive theme, either -is or -isis diminutive)
      mamam+Err/Dummy+N+A+Sg: mamam
      mamam+Err/Dummy+N+A+Pl: mamamak
      mamam+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: [mamamis, mamamisîs]
      mamam+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nimamam
      mamam+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv: nimamama
      mamam+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: nimamamak
      mamam+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm: nimamamim
      mamam+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv+Err/Thm: nimamamima
      mamam+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl+Err/Thm: nimamamimak
      mamam+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: omamama
      omamamim+?: omamamim
      mamam+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv+Err/Thm: omamamima
      mamam+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: [nimamamis, nimamamisîs]
      mamam+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm: [nimamamimis, nimamamimisîs, nimamamisim, nimamamisîsim]
      mamam+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: nimamaminân
      mamam+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Thm: nimamamiminân
      mamam+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: nimamamisinân
      mamam+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Thm: [nimamamisiminân, nimamamimisinân]

      # papap - NA_POSS/IM (-im between stem and diminutuve, either -is or -isîs diminutive)
      papap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Sg: papap
      papap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Pl: papapak
      papap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: [papapis, papapisîs]
      papap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm: nipapap
      papap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv+Err/Thm: nipapapa
      papap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl+Err/Thm: nipapapak
      papap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nipapapim
      papap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv: nipapapima
      papap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: nipapapimak
      papap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv+Err/Thm: opapapa
      opapapim+?: opapapim
      papap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: opapapima
      papap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm: [nipapapis, nipapapisîs, nipapapisim, nipapapisîsim]
      papap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: [nipapapimis, nipapapimisîs]
      papap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Thm: nipapapinân
      papap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: nipapapiminân
      papap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Thm: [nipapapisinân, nipapapisiminân]
      papap+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: nipapapimisinân

      # pipip - NA_POSS/IM2 (-im after diminutive, either -is or -isîs diminutive)
      pipip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Sg: pipip
      pipip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Pl: pipipak
      pipip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: [pipipis, pipipisîs]
      pipip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm: nipipip
      pipip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv+Err/Thm: nipipipa
      pipip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl+Err/Thm: nipipipak
      pipip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nipipipim
      pipip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv: nipipipima
      pipip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: nipipipimak
      pipip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv+Err/Thm: opipipa
      opipipim+?: opipipim
      pipip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: opipipima
      pipip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm: [nipipipis, nipipipisîs, nipipipimis, nipipipimisîs]
      pipip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: [nipipipisim, nipipipisîsim]
      pipip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Thm: nipipipinân
      pipip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: nipipipiminân
      pipip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Thm: [nipipipisinân, nipipipimisinân]
      pipip+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: nipipipisiminân

      # tatat - NA_DIM/IS (no -im, only -is diminutive)
      tatat+Err/Dummy+N+A+Sg: tatat
      tatat+Err/Dummy+N+A+Pl: tatatak
      tatat+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: cacacis
      tatat+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg+Err/Dim: cacacisîs
      tatat+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nitatat
      tatat+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv: nitatata
      tatat+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: nitatatak
      tatat+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm: nitatatim
      tatat+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv+Err/Thm: nitatatima
      tatat+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl+Err/Thm: nitatatimak
      tatat+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: otatata
      otatatim+?: otatatim
      tatat+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv+Err/Thm: otatatima
      tatat+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nicacacis
      tatat+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Dim: nicacacisîs
      tatat+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm: [nicacacisim, nicacacimis]
      tatat+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm+Err/Dim: [nicacacisîsim, nicacacimisîs]
      tatat+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: nitatatinân
      tatat+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Thm: nitatatiminân
      tatat+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: nicacacisinân
      tatat+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Thm: [nicacacimisinân, nicacacisiminân]
      
      # titit - NA_DIM/ISIS (no -im, only -isîs diminutive)
      titit+Err/Dummy+N+A+Sg: titit
      titit+Err/Dummy+N+A+Pl: tititak
      titit+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg+Err/Dim: cicicis
      titit+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: cicicisîs
      titit+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nititit
      titit+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv: nititita
      titit+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: nitititak
      titit+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm: nitititim
      titit+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv+Err/Thm: nitititima
      titit+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl+Err/Thm: nitititimak
      titit+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: otitita
      otititim+?: otititim
      titit+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv+Err/Thm: otititima
      titit+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Dim: nicicicis
      titit+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nicicicisîs
      titit+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm+Err/Dim: [nicicicisim, nicicicimis]
      titit+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm: [nicicicisîsim, nicicicimisîs]
      titit+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: nitititinân
      titit+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Thm: nitititiminân
      titit+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Dim: nicicicisinân
      titit+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Thm+Err/Dim: [nicicicimisinân, nicicicisiminân]
      
      # nanan - NA_POSS/IM_DIM/IS (-im between stem and diminutive, only -is diminutive) 
      nanan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Sg: nanan
      nanan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Pl: nananak
      nanan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: nananis
      nanan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg+Err/Dim: nananisîs
      nanan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm: ninanan
      nanan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv+Err/Thm: ninanana
      nanan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl+Err/Thm: ninananak
      nanan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: ninananim
      nanan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv: ninananima
      nanan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: ninananimak
      nanan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv+Err/Thm: onanana
      onananim+?: onananim
      nanan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: onananima
      nanan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm: [ninananis, ninananisim]
      nanan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm+Err/Dim: [ninananisîs, ninananisîsim]
      nanan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: ninananimis
      nanan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Dim: ninananimisîs
      nanan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Thm: ninananinân
      nanan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: ninananiminân
      nanan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Thm: [ninananisinân, ninananisiminân]
      nanan+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: ninananimisinân
      
      # ninin - NA_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS (-im between stem and diminutive, only -isîs diminutive) 
      ninin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Sg: ninin
      ninin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Pl: nininak
      ninin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: nininisîs
      ninin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg+Err/Dim: nininis
      ninin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm: nininin
      ninin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv+Err/Thm: nininina
      ninin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl+Err/Thm: ninininak
      ninin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: ninininim
      ninin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv: ninininima
      ninin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: ninininimak
      ninin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv+Err/Thm: oninina
      onininim+?: onininim
      ninin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: onininima
      ninin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: ninininimisîs
      ninin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Dim: ninininimis
      ninin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm: [ninininisîs, ninininisîsim]
      ninin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm+Err/Dim: [ninininis, ninininisim]
      ninin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Thm: nininininân
      ninin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: ninininiminân
      ninin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Thm: [ninininisîsinân, ninininisîsiminân]
      ninin+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: ninininimisîsinân
      
      # kikik - NA_POSS/IM2_DIM/IS (-im after diminutive, only -is diminutive)
      kikik+Err/Dummy+N+A+Sg: kikik
      kikik+Err/Dummy+N+A+Pl: kikikak
      kikik+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: kikikis
      kikik+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg+Err/Dim: kikikisîs
      kikik+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm: nikikik
      kikik+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv+Err/Thm: nikikika
      kikik+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl+Err/Thm: nikikikak
      kikik+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nikikikim
      kikik+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv: nikikikima
      kikik+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: nikikikimak
      kikik+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv+Err/Thm: okikika
      okikikim+?: okikikim
      kikik+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: okikikima
      kikik+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm: [nikikikis, nikikikimis]
      kikik+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm+Err/Dim: [nikikikisîs, nikikikimisîs]
      kikik+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nikikikisim
      kikik+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Dim: nikikikisîsim
      kikik+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Thm: nikikikinân
      kikik+Err/Dummy+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: nikikikiminân
      kikik+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg+Err/Thm: [nikikikisinân, nikikikimisinân]
      kikik+Err/Dummy+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: nikikikisiminân
